North Carolina, session 2025, HB924.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 87-13.2. Board may refer violations for criminal prosecution.
(a) Whenever the Board has reasonable grounds to believe that a person or entity has
committed a violation of this Article that is subject to criminal penalty, the Board may refer the
matter to the appropriate law enforcement agency or District Attorney for investigation and
possible criminal prosecution.
(b) Notwithstanding any confidentiality of investigative records that the Board holds, the
Board may disclose such records to law enforcement agencies or prosecutors to facilitate
investigation or prosecution of violations under this Article.
(c) Nothing in this Article shall be construed to limit the Board's ability to assist in
criminal prosecutions, including sharing information or using Board funds as authorized by this
Article to support such prosecutions.
(d) Nothing in this Article limits the power of the State to punish any person for any
conduct that constitutes a crime under any other statute."
SECTION 1.(b) Additional Rulemaking. – The State Licensing Board for General
Contractors may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. Effective Date. – This act is effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
violations committed on or after that date.
*H924-v-1*